District of Columbia statutes.
4-405

Schedule of payments by parents.

(a)

Parents who receive day care services pursuant to § 4-404 [repealed] shall pay a portion of services according to the sliding scale set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

Increment
Adjusted Income
Parent Fee (Percent of Child Care Paid by Parent)

1
Under $8,020
Flat Fee of $2 per week

2
$8,020–$9,012
5%

3
$9,013–$10,005
10%

4
$10,006–$10,998
15%

5
$10,999–$11,991
20%

6
$11,992–$12,984
25%

7
$12,985–$13,977
30%

8
$13,978–$14,970
35%

9
$14,971–$15,963
40%

10
$15,964–$16,956
45%

11
$16,957–$17,949
50%

12
$17,950–$18,942
55%

13
$18,943–$19,935
60%

14
$19,936–$20,928
65%

15
$20,929–$21,921
70%

16 Over
$21,921
100%

(c)

The fee schedule shall be effective April 1, 1990. The Mayor may revise the fee schedule by rule.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 6, 26 DCR 20
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-166, § 2, 27 DCR 5355
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-163, § 2(c), 29 DCR 3974
June 22, 1990, D.C. Law 8-144, § 3(c), 37 DCR 2974
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-202, § 3(c), 37 DCR 7937
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 11, 40 DCR 6311
This section is referenced in § 4-402.01 and § 4-409.
1981 Ed., § 3-305.
1973 Ed., § 3-305.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-202, the “D.C. Family Support Act Federal Conformity Amendment Act of 1990”, Effective March 6, 1991, see Mayor’s Order 2000-157, October 12, 2000 ( 47 DCR 8683).